Arkansas, session 2025, HB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The childcare needs in Arkansas necessitate the enhancement
of accessible childcare options for families, particularly in rural and
small-town areas;
(2) Exempting licensed childcare homes from restrictive zoning
regulations would facilitate the growth of small businesses, contributing to
local economies and community vitality; and
(3) Successful outcomes in communities such as Gentry and
Gravette demonstrate that support for childcare initiatives can lead to an
increase in available slots for children without negatively impacting local
resources.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-78-229(b), concerning compliance with
local regulations under the Childcare Facility Licensing Act, is amended to
read as follows:
*SSS205*
04/07/2025 9:37:07 AM SSS205

HB1997
(b)(1) The Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the
Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education shall require any
childcare facility seeking licensure under this subchapter to comply with
applicable zoning and land use development regulations of the municipality
and county where the childcare facility is located.
(2) Failure to comply with applicable zoning and land use
regulations is grounds for the denial of a license of a childcare facility.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-78-229 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1) As used in this subsection, "licensure" means the process
through which the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education grants
permission to operate a childcare family home under this subchapter.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(3) of this section,
a childcare family home that is licensed or seeking licensure under this
subchapter is exempt from local zoning ordinances that restrict the operation
of a childcare family home.
(B) An exemption from local zoning ordinances under
subdivision (f)(2) of this section applies to all residential properties
within corporate limits of a municipality.
(3) A municipality shall enforce existing health and safety
regulations applicable to all childcare facilities to ensure community
standards are upheld.
(4) The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education
shall provide guidance and resources to aspiring childcare providers to
ensure adherence to essential health, safety, and educational standards and
this subsection.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and
determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a
need for accessible childcare options throughout the state; that rural
communities cannot increase childcare options due to restrictive zoning
regulations of the local government; and that this act is immediately
necessary because increasing access to affordable childcare is needed to
preserve public health, peace, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
04/07/2025 9:37:07 AM SSS205

HB1997
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.




























04/07/2025 9:37:07 AM SSS205